Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-385
Division of Motor Carrier Services; established; Administrator of Motor Carrier Services; appointment.

The Division of Motor Carrier Services is established within the Department of Motor Vehicles. The Director of Motor Vehicles shall appoint the Administrator of Motor Carrier Services. The administrator shall administer the affairs of the division.

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 1.